Oklahoma, session 2025, SB965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 385, is


amended to read as follows:


A. Every juror or person drawn or summoned as a juror, or


chosen arbitrator, or umpire, or appointed referee, who either:


1. Makes any promise or agreement to give a verdict for or


against any party; or,


2. Willfully permits any communication to be made to him, or


receives any book, paper, instrument, or information relative to any


cause pending before him, except according to the regular course of


proceeding upon the trial of such cause, is guilty of a misdemeanor.


B. Subsequent violations or egregious violations of subsection


A of this section may be charged as a felony.

Req. No. 506 Page 1


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-506 TEK 1/19/2025 5:46:51 AM











































Req. No. 506 Page 2